North Carolina, session 2025, SB1002.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143B-437.02A reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-437.02A. The Film and Entertainment Grant Fund.
(a) Creation and Purpose of Fund. – There is created in the Department of Commerce a
special, nonreverting account to be known as the Film and Entertainment Grant Fund to provide
funds to encourage the production of motion pictures, television shows, movies for television,
productions intended for on-line distribution, and commercials and to develop the filmmaking
industry within the State. The Department of Commerce shall adopt guidelines providing for the
administration of the program. Those guidelines may provide for the Secretary to award the grant
proceeds over a period of time, not to exceed three years. Those guidelines shall include the
following provisions, which shall apply to each grant from the account:
(1) The funds are reserved for a production on which the production company has
qualifying expenses of at least the following:
…
b. For a production consisting of a series of episodes intended for on-line
distribution or a television series, five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) per episode.
…
(2) The funds are not used to provide a grant in excess of any of the following:
a. An amount more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the qualifying
expenses for the production.
b. An amount more than seven million dollars ($7,000,000) twenty
million dollars ($20,000,000) for a feature-length film, film or a single
season of a production consisting of a series of episodes intended for
on-line distribution, more than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000)
twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for a single season of a
television series, or two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for
a commercial for theatrical or television viewing or on-line
distribution. The amount of a grant for the first season of a series, when
added to any grant awarded for the pilot episode of that series, may not
exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).
(3) The funds are not used to provide a grant to more than one production
company for a single production.
*S1002-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The funds are not used to provide a grant for a production that meets one or
more of the following:
…
f. It is a talk, game, talk show, recorded concert or other live performance
event for theatrical or other release, or awards show or other gala
event. For purposes of this exception, an awards show is television
programming involving the filming of a ceremony in which
individuals, groups, or organizations are given an award.
…
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
…
(3) Highly compensated individual. – An individual who directly or indirectly
receives compensation in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) four
million dollars ($4,000,000) for personal services with respect to a single
production. An individual receives compensation indirectly when a
production company pays a personal service company or an employee leasing
company that pays the individual.
…
(5) Production. – Any of the following:
a. A motion picture intended for commercial distribution to a motion
picture theater or directly to the consumer viewing market that has a
running time of at least 75 minutes.
b. A television series or a commercial for theatrical or television viewing,
made-for-television movie, or production intended for on-line
distribution. For video and a television series, a production is all of the
episodes of the series produced for a single season. For a production
intended for on-line distribution, the production is all the episodes
produced for a single calendar year, provided there are at least six
episodes with an average running time of at least 20 minutes.
(6) Production company. – Defined in G.S. 105-164.3.A person engaged in the
business of making original motion pictures or video content for theatrical,
commercial, advertising, or educational purposes.
(7) Qualifying expenses. – The sum of the amounts listed in this subdivision,
substantiated pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, and spent in this State
by a production company in connection with a production, less the amount
paid in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) four million dollars
($4,000,000) to a highly compensated individual:
a. Goods and services leased or purchased. For goods with a purchase
price of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more, the amount
included in qualifying expenses is the purchase price less the fair
market value of the good at the time the production is completed.
Goods and services includes the costs of tangible and intangible
property used for, and services performed primarily and customarily
in, production, including preproduction and postproduction and other
direct costs of producing the project in accordance with generally
accepted entertainment industry practices. Goods and services exclude
costs the following:
1. Costs for development, marketing, and distribution; costs
distribution.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1002-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2. Costs of financing for the production, of bonding related to the
production, of production-related insurance coverage obtained
on the production; and expenses production.
3. Expenses for insurance coverage purchased from a related
member.
4. For game shows and productions that document purportedly
unscripted real-life situations primarily using unfamiliar
people in lieu of professional actors, (i) costs for and value of
prizes awarded and (ii) the fair market value of any item in the
show intentionally or negligently used or destroyed for
entertainment purposes immediately prior to its destruction or
use.
…
(h) Micro-Budget Productions Account. – There is created in the Film and Entertainment
Grant Fund a special, nonreverting account to be known as the Micro-Budget Productions
Account to provide funds to encourage smaller productions to develop the filmmaking industry
within the State. The Department of Commerce shall adopt guidelines providing for the
administration of the program. Those guidelines shall apply to each grant from the account and
shall adhere to the provisions in this section, with the following modifications:
(1) The funds are reserved for a production on which the production company has
qualifying expenses of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the State but
not more than one million four hundred ninety-nine thousand dollars
($1,499,000) for the production.
(2) The funds are not used to provide a grant in excess of (i) a base amount equal
to the lesser of twenty percent (20%) of the qualifying expenses for the
production or one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) plus (ii) any of the
following:
a. A bonus amount equal to five percent (5%) of the base amount if the
production company provides qualified accounting showing at least
seventy-five percent (75%) of the compensation and wages paid for
the production was paid to North Carolina residents. For purposes of
this sub-subdivision, "qualified accounting" by the production
company includes both (i) withholding payments remitted to the
Department of Revenue under Article 4A of Chapter 105 of the
General Statutes and (ii) payments for compensation to independent
contractors reported using a Form 1099. In calculating whether the
required percentage has been met, the following shall be included in
compensation and wages: employee fringe contributions, including
health, pension, and welfare contributions; per diems, stipends, and
living allowances paid for work being performed in this State; and
payments made to a loan-out company for services provided in the
State.
b. A bonus amount equal to (i) three percent (3%) if at least seventy-five
percent (75%) of the filming occurred in development tier two and one
areas or (ii) five percent (5%) if at least seventy-five percent (75%) of
the filming occurred in a development tier one area. For purposes of
this sub-subdivision, a "development tier area" is as defined in
G.S. 143B-437.08.
(3) The funds are reserved for a production for which at least seventy-five percent
(75%) of the filming occurred in the State by or with a production company
with company headquarters, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.01, in this State.
Senate Bill 1002-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The funds are not contingent on the existence, proof, or guarantee of a
distribution agreement.
(5) A production is not limited to feature-length films, television series, or
commercials but can consist of short films, documentaries, or other similar
audiovisual works intended for distribution that meet the requirements of this
subsection.
(6) No grant may be awarded that, when considered together with other grants
awarded during a single calendar year, could cause the State's potential total
annual liability for grants awarded in a single calendar year to exceed the
amount available in the Account."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring
funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to the Micro-Budget Productions Account
established in Section 1 of this act for purposes consistent with that Account.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to grants made on
or after that date.
Page 4 Senate Bill 1002-First Edition